Maryland, session 2025, HB1259.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
11–102.
This title applies only in Anne Arundel County.
11–1102.
(d) (1) There is a dancing permit.
(2) The Board may issue the permit to a holder of:
(i) a Class B license;
– 1 –

Ch. 839 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) except as provided in paragraph (4) of this subsection, a Class
BLX license;
(iii) a Class C license;
(iv) a Class D license; or
(v) except as provided in paragraph (4) of this subsection, a Class H
license.
(3) The permit authorizes the holder to provide music, dancing, and other
legal forms of entertainment.
(4) (I) The Board may not issue the permit to a holder of a Class BLX
license or a Class H license if the premises for which the Class BLX license or Class H
license is issued is within 1,000 feet in a straight line from entry to entry from a place of
worship or school.
(II) NOTWITHSTANDING SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, THE BOARD MAY ISSUE THE PERMIT TO THE HOLDER OF A CLASS H
LICENSE IF THE LICENSED PREMISES IS LOCATED WITHIN 1,000 FEET IN A STRAIGHT
LINE FROM ENTRY TO ENTRY FROM A SCHOOL LOCATED AT THE ANNAPOLIS MALL.
(5) The annual permit fees are:
(i) $200 for a holder of a beer and wine license;
(ii) $400 for a holder of a beer, wine, and liquor license; and
(iii) no charge for a holder of a Class C license.
11–1603.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, the Board may not issue a
new license for an establishment whose entry is within 1,000 feet in a straight line from
the entry of a place of worship or school.
(b) The prohibition against issuing a license in subsection (a) of this section does
not apply to:
(1) the transfer of a license from the current license holder to a new license
holder, unless the transfer would allow the sale of alcoholic beverages by another
establishment within the 1,000–foot restriction;
(2) a nonprofit club or nonprofit organization;
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 839
(3) a restaurant that held a license at the time the restaurant was
destroyed by fire, flood, windstorm, or other act of God, if a new place of worship or school
has not been constructed within the 1,000–foot restriction;
(4) the issuance of a Class H beer and wine (on–sale) license or beer, wine,
and liquor (on–sale) license;
(5) the issuance of a motel–restaurant complex or hotel–restaurant
complex beer, wine, and liquor (on–sale) license;
(6) the issuance of a Class BLX (deluxe restaurant) (on–sale) beer, wine,
and liquor license; [or]
(7) the issuance of a gift basket permit; OR
(8) THE ISSUANCE OF A CLASS B BEER AND WINE (ON–SALE) LICENSE
OR CLASS B BEER, WINE, AND LIQUOR (ON–SALE) LICENSE FOR AN ESTABLISHMENT
LOCATED WITHIN 1,000 FEET OF A SCHOOL LOCATED AT THE ANNAPOLIS MALL.
(c) For an establishment that is within 1,000 feet of the grounds of a place of
worship or school, the Board:
(1) may renew a license;
(2) may extend the area of the licensed premises; but
(3) may not change the operational classification of an existing license,
unless the change is from a Class B, Class C, or Class D license to a Class H license.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 3 –